test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ooqbil_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ǭʼbiļ: # Noun 242 'eng /est ristik/fin' - full paradigm
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Nom: [ǭʼbiļ, ǭbiļ]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Gen: [ǭʼbiļ, ǭbiļ]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Par: [ǭʼbiļt, ǭbiļt]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Dat: [ǭʼbiļõn, ǭbiļõn]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Ins: [ǭʼbiļõks, ǭbiļõks]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Ill: [ǭʼbiļõ, ǭbiļõ]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Sg+Ela: [ǭʼbiļšt, ǭbiļšt]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Nom: [ǭʼbiļd, ǭbiļd]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Gen: [ǭʼbiļd, ǭbiļd]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Par: [ǭʼbiļi, ǭbiļi]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Dat: [ǭʼbiļdõn, ǭbiļdõn]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Ins: [ǭʼbiļdõks, ǭbiļdõks]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Ill: [ǭʼbiļiž, ǭbiļiž]
     ǭʼbiļ+N+Pl+Ela: [ǭʼbiļist, ǭbiļist]
